Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-160
Public accountant; absence of permit; requirement to so state; exceptions.

No person, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation not holding a permit issued under section 1-136 which is not revoked or suspended shall hold himself, herself, or itself out to the public as an accountant or auditor by use of either or both of such words on any sign, card, or letterhead or in any advertisement or directory without indicating thereon or therein that such person, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation does not hold such a permit. This section shall not prohibit any officer, employee, partner, member, or principal of any organization from describing himself or herself by the position, title, or office he or she holds in such organization nor any act of any public official or public employee in the performance of his or her duties as such.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 55, p. 75;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 56;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 50.